Utah statutes.
19-2-105.   Duties of board.

The board, in conjunction with the governing body of each county identified in Section 41-6a-1643 and other interested parties, shall perform an evaluation of the inspection and maintenance program developed under Section 41-6a-1643 including issues relating to:

(1)  the implementation of a standardized inspection and maintenance program;

(2)  out-of-state registration of vehicles used in Utah;

(3)  out-of-county registration of vehicles used within the areas required to have an inspection and maintenance program;

(4)  use of the farm truck exemption;

(5)  mechanic training programs;

(6)  emissions standards; and

(7)  emissions waivers.

